errortag-src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON VIHTTA
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta%> K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:đa%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:htti%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:đa%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:đa%>jgujn K ;

LEXICON VIHTTANUPPELOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#nuppe#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#nuppe#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#nuppe#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#nuppe#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#nuppe#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>n#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#nuppe#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>n#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa%>#nuppe#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:đa%>#nuppe#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#nuppe#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#nuppe#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta%>#nuppe#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>t#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#nuppe#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON VIHTTAGOALMMATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#goalmmát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#goalmmát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#goalmmát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#goalmmát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa%>#goalmmát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:đa%>#goalmmát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#goalmmát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#goalmmát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta%>#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>t#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;


 LEXICON VIHTTANJEALJATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#njealját#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#njealját#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#njealját#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#njealját#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#njealját#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>n#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>n#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa%>#njealját#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:đa%>#njealját#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#njealját#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#njealját#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta%>#njealját#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>t#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#njealját#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON VIHTTAVIDATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta%>#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#viđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#viđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#viđát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#viđát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#viđát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>n#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>n#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa%>#viđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:đa%>#viđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa%>#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#viđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#viđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta%>#viđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>t#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>jd#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#viđát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F
vihtta#nuppe#lohkái:vi VIHTTANUPPELOHKAI ;
vihtta#goalmmát#lohkái:vi VIHTTAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
vihtta#njealját#lohkái:vi VIHTTANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
vihtta#viđát#lohkái:vi VIHTTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
guhtta#nuppe#lohkái:gu VIHTTANUPPELOHKAI ;
guhtta#goalmmát#lohkái:gu VIHTTAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
guhtta#njealját#lohkái:gu VIHTTANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
guhtta#viđát#lohkái:gu VIHTTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119
vihtta#nuppe#lohkái:vi VIHTTANUPPELOHKAI ;
vihtta#goalmmát#lohkái:vi VIHTTAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
vihtta#njealját#lohkái:vi VIHTTANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
vihtta#viđát#lohkái:vi VIHTTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
guhtta#nuppe#lohkái:gu VIHTTANUPPELOHKAI ;
guhtta#goalmmát#lohkái:gu VIHTTAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
guhtta#njealját#lohkái:gu VIHTTANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
guhtta#viđát#lohkái:gu VIHTTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
